Hawaii statutes.
§342D-11 Injunctive and other
relief. The director may institute a civil action in any environmental
court of competent jurisdiction for injunctive and other relief to prevent any
violation of this chapter, any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter, or any
condition of a permit or variance issued pursuant to this chapter, without the
necessity of a prior revocation of the permit or variance, to impose and
collect civil penalties, to collect administrative penalties, or to obtain
other relief. The environmental court shall have power to grant relief in
accordance with the Hawaii rules of civil procedure. [L 1989, c 212, pt of §2;
am L 1995, c 180, §11; am L 2014, c 218, §8]

Rules of Court

Injunctions, see HRCP rule 65.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next